Tennessee, session 114, HB0196.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-3-104, is amended by deleting
subsection (a) and substituting:
(a) A person who transfers land by execution of a general warranty deed with
knowledge of outstanding liens, mortgages, deeds of trust, or other claims against such
transferred land with the intent to defraud, commits a Class E felony, punishable with
imprisonment as described in § 40-35-111(b)(5). In addition, the jury may assess a fine
not to exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0196
001717
- 1 -